Illinois, session 104th, HB1625.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Ground-Based Sparkler Purchaser Excise Tax Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Affirmative act in furtherance of the evasion" means an 8act designed in whole or in part to (i) conceal, misrepresent, 9falsify, or manipulate any material fact or (ii) tamper with 10or destroy documents or materials related to a person's tax 11liability under this Act.12    "Automated sales suppression device" or "zapper" means a 13software program that falsifies the electronic records of an 14electronic cash register or other point-of-sale system, 15including, but not limited to, transaction data and 16transaction reports. "Automated sales suppression device" or 17"zapper" includes the software program, any device that 18carries the software program, or an Internet link to the 19software program.20    "Consumer distributor" means any person who distributes, 21offers for sale, sells, or exchanges for consideration 22consumer fireworks in this State to another distributor or 23directly to any retailer or person for resale.  HB1625- 2 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1    "Consumer retailer" means any person who offers for sale, 2sells, or exchanges for consideration consumer fireworks in 3this State directly to any person with a consumer display 4permit.5    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.6    "Director" means the Director of Revenue.7    "Electronic cash register" means a device that keeps a 8register or supporting documents through the use of an 9electronic device or computer system designed to record 10transaction data for the purpose of computing, compiling, or 11processing retail sales transaction data in any manner.12    "Ground-based sparkler" means any ground-based sparkler 13device that (i) is nonexplosive and nonaerial, (ii) may 14produce a crackling or whistling effect, and (iii) contains 75 15grams or less of pyrotechnic composition per tube or a total of 16500 grams or less for multiple tubes, such as cones, including 17showers of sparks, as well as fountains.18    "Ground-based sparkler retailer" means any person that 19transfers the ownership of or title to ground-based sparklers 20to a purchaser, for the purpose of use, and not for the purpose 21of resale, for a valuable consideration.22    "Person" means a natural individual, firm, partnership, 23association, joint-stock company, joint adventure, public or 24private corporation, limited liability company, or a receiver, 25executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 26by order of any court.  HB1625- 3 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1    "Phantom-ware" means a hidden programming option embedded 2in the operating system of an electronic cash register or 3hardwired into an electronic cash register that can be used to 4create a second set of records or that can eliminate or 5manipulate transaction records in an electronic cash register.6    "Purchase price" means the consideration paid for a 7purchase of ground-based sparklers, valued in money, whether 8received in money or otherwise, including cash, gift cards, 9credits, and property and shall be determined without any 10deduction on account of the cost of materials used, labor or 11service costs, or any other expense whatsoever. "Purchase 12price" does not include consideration paid for:13        (1) any charge for a payment that is not honored by a 14    financial institution;15        (2) any finance or credit charge, penalty or charge 16    for delayed payment, or discount for prompt payment; and17        (3) any amounts added to a purchaser's bill because of 18    charges made under the tax imposed by this Act, the 19    Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 20    Service Occupation Tax Act, the Service Use Tax Act, or 21    any locally imposed occupation or use tax.22    "Purchaser" means a person who, through a sale at retail, 23acquires ground-based sparklers for a valuable consideration.24    "Taxpayer" means a ground-based sparkler retailer who is 25required to collect the tax imposed under this Act.26    "Transaction data" includes items purchased by a   HB1625- 4 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1purchaser, the price of each item, a taxability determination 2for each item, a segregated tax amount for each taxed item, the 3amount of cash or credit tendered, the net amount returned to 4the customer in change, the date and time of the purchase, the 5name, address, and identification number of the vendor, and 6the receipt or invoice number of the transaction.7    "Transaction report" means a report that documents, 8without limitation, the sales, taxes, or fees collected, media 9totals, and discount voids at an electronic cash register and 10that is printed on a cash register tape at the end of a day or 11shift, or a report that documents every action at an 12electronic cash register and is stored electronically. 13    Section 10. Tax imposed. 14    (a) Beginning July 1, 2026, a tax is imposed upon 15purchasers for the privilege of using ground-based sparklers 16and not for the purpose of resale at the rate of 3% of the 17purchase price of ground-based sparklers.18    (b) The tax imposed under this Act shall be in addition to 19all other occupation, privilege, or excise taxes imposed by 20the State or by any municipal corporation or political 21subdivision thereof.22    (c) The tax imposed under this Act shall not be imposed on 23any purchase by a purchaser if the ground-based sparkler 24retailer is prohibited by federal or State Constitution, 25treaty, convention, statute, or court decision from collecting   HB1625- 5 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1the tax from the purchaser. 2    Section 15. Bundling of taxable and nontaxable items; 3prohibition; taxation. A ground-based sparkler retailer is 4prohibited from selling ground-based sparkler products in 5combination or bundled with any other items not subject to tax 6under this Act for one price, and each ground-based sparkler 7must be separately identified by quantity and price on the 8receipt.9    If a ground-based sparkler retailer sells ground-based 10sparkler products in combination or bundled with items that 11are not subject to tax under this Act for one price in 12violation of the prohibition on this activity, then the tax 13under this Act is imposed on the purchase price of the entire 14bundled product. 15    Section 20. Collection of tax.16    (a) The tax imposed by this Act shall be collected from the 17purchaser by the ground-based sparkler retailer at the rate 18stated in Section 10 with respect to ground-based sparklers 19sold by the ground-based sparkler retailer to the purchaser 20and shall be remitted to the Department as provided in Section 2135. Ground-based sparkler retailers shall collect the tax from 22purchasers by adding the tax to the amount of the purchase 23price received from the purchaser for selling ground-based 24sparklers to the purchaser. The tax imposed by this Act shall,   HB1625- 6 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1when collected, be stated as a distinct item separate and 2apart from the purchase price of the ground-based sparklers.3    (b) If a ground-based sparkler retailer collects the 4ground-based sparkler purchaser excise tax measured by a 5purchase price that is not subject to the ground-based 6sparkler purchaser excise tax, or if a ground-based sparkler 7retailer, in collecting the ground-based sparkler purchaser 8excise tax measured by a purchase price that is subject to tax 9under this Act, collects more from the purchaser than the 10required amount of the ground-based sparkler purchaser excise 11tax on the transaction, the purchaser shall have a legal right 12to claim a refund of that amount from the ground-based 13sparkler retailer. If, however, that amount is not refunded to 14the purchaser for any reason, the ground-based sparkler 15retailer is liable to pay that amount to the Department.16    (c) Any person purchasing ground-based sparklers subject 17to tax under this Act as to which there has been no charge made 18to them of the tax imposed by Section 10 shall make payment of 19the tax imposed by Section 10 in the form and manner provided 20by the Department not later than the 20th day of the month 21following the month of purchase of the ground-based sparklers. 22    Section 25. Registration of ground-based sparkler 23retailers. Every ground-based sparkler retailer required to 24collect the tax under this Act shall apply to the Department 25for a certificate of registration under this Act. All   HB1625- 7 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1applications for registration under this Act shall be made by 2electronic means in the form and manner required by the 3Department. For that purpose, the provisions of Section 2a of 4the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act are incorporated into this 5Act to the extent not inconsistent with this Act. In addition, 6no certificate of registration shall be issued under this Act 7unless the applicant is licensed under the Retailers' 8Occupation Tax Act. 9    Section 30. Tax collected as debt owed to State. Any 10ground-based sparkler retailer required to collect the tax 11imposed by this Act shall be liable to the Department for the 12tax, whether the tax has been collected by the ground-based 13sparkler retailer, and any such tax shall constitute a debt 14owed by the ground-based sparkler retailer to the State. To 15the extent that a ground-based sparkler retailer is required 16to collect the tax imposed by this Act has actually collected 17that tax, the tax is held in trust for the benefit of the 18Department. 19    Section 35. Return and payment of tax by ground-based 20sparkler retailer. Each ground-based sparkler retailer that is 21required or authorized to collect the tax imposed by this Act 22shall make a return to the Department, by electronic means, on 23or before the 20th day of each month for the preceding calendar 24month stating:  HB1625- 8 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1        (1) the ground-based sparkler retailer's name;2        (2) the address of the ground-based sparkler 3    retailer's principal place of business and the address of 4    the principal place of business, if that is a different 5    address, from which the ground-based sparkler retailer is 6    engaged in the business of selling ground-based sparklers 7    subject to tax under this Act;8        (3) the total purchase price received by the 9    ground-based sparkler retailer for ground-based sparklers 10    subject to tax under this Act;11        (4) the amount of tax due at each rate;12        (5) the signature of the ground-based sparkler 13    retailer; and14        (6) any other information as the Department may 15    reasonably require.16    All returns required to be filed and payments required to 17be made under this Act shall be by electronic means. 18Ground-based sparkler retailers who demonstrate hardship in 19paying electronically may petition the Department to waive the 20electronic payment requirement.21    Any amount that is required to be shown or reported on any 22return or other document under this Act shall, if the amount is 23not a whole-dollar amount, be increased to the nearest 24whole-dollar amount if the fractional part of a dollar is 25$0.50 or more and decreased to the nearest whole-dollar amount 26if the fractional part of a dollar is less than $0.50. If a   HB1625- 9 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1total amount of less than $1 is payable, refundable, or 2creditable, the amount shall be disregarded if it is less than 3$0.50 and shall be increased to $1 if it is $0.50 or more.4    The ground-based sparkler retailer making the return under 5this Section shall also pay to the Department the amount of tax 6imposed by this Act, less a discount of 1.75%, not to exceed 7$1,000 per return period, which is allowed to reimburse the 8ground-based sparkler retailer for the expenses incurred in 9keeping records, collecting tax, preparing and filing returns, 10remitting the tax, and supplying data to the Department upon 11request. No discount may be claimed by a ground-based sparkler 12retailer on returns not timely filed and for taxes not timely 13remitted. No discount may be claimed by a taxpayer for any 14return that is not filed electronically. No discount may be 15claimed by a taxpayer for any payment that is not made 16electronically, unless a waiver has been granted under this 17Section.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act concerning 19the time within which a ground-based sparkler retailer may 20file a return, any such ground-based sparkler retailer who 21ceases to engage in the kind of business that makes the person 22responsible for filing returns under this Act shall file a 23final return under this Act with the Department within one 24month after discontinuing the business.25    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 26taxpayer's liabilities under this Act, as shown on an original   HB1625- 10 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1monthly return, the Department shall, if requested by the 2taxpayer, issue to the taxpayer a credit memorandum no later 3than 30 days after the date of payment. The credit evidenced by 4the credit memorandum may be assigned by the taxpayer to a 5similar taxpayer under this Act, in accordance with reasonable 6rules adopted by the Department. If no such request is made, 7the taxpayer may credit the excess payment against tax 8liability subsequently to be remitted to the Department under 9this Act, in accordance with reasonable rules adopted by the 10Department. If the Department subsequently determines that all 11or any part of the credit taken was not actually due to the 12taxpayer, the taxpayer's discount shall be reduced, if 13necessary, to reflect the difference between the credit taken 14and that actually due, and that taxpayer shall be liable for 15penalties and interest on the difference. If a ground-based 16sparkler retailer fails to sign a return within 30 days after 17the proper notice and demand for signature by the Department 18is received by the ground-based sparkler retailer, the return 19shall be considered valid and any amount shown to be due on the 20return shall be deemed assessed. 21    Section 40. Deposit of proceeds. From the revenue 22collected under Section 10, the Department shall pay 25% into 23the Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund, 25% into the 24Firefighters' Pension Investment Fund, and 50% into the 25General Revenue Fund.   HB1625- 11 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1    Section 45. Recordkeeping; books and records.2    (a) Every ground-based sparkler retailer, whether the 3ground-based sparkler retailer has obtained a certificate of 4registration under Section 25, shall keep complete and 5accurate records of ground-based sparklers held, purchased, 6sold, or otherwise disposed of, and shall preserve and keep 7all invoices, bills of lading, sales records, and copies of 8bills of sale, returns, and other pertinent papers and 9documents relating to the purchase, sale, or disposition of 10ground-based sparklers. Such records need not be maintained on 11the licensed premises but must be maintained in the State. 12However, all original invoices or copies thereof covering 13purchases of ground-based sparklers must be retained on the 14licensed premises for a period of 90 days after such purchase, 15unless the Department has granted a waiver in response to a 16written request in cases where records are kept at a central 17business location within the State. The Department shall adopt 18rules regarding the eligibility for a waiver, revocation of a 19waiver, and requirements and standards for maintenance and 20accessibility of records located at a central location under a 21waiver provided under this Section.22    (b) Books, records, papers, and documents that are 23required by this Act to be kept shall, at all times during the 24usual business hours of the day, be subject to inspection by 25the Department or its duly authorized agents and employees.   HB1625- 12 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1The books, records, papers, and documents for any period with 2respect to which the Department is authorized to issue a 3notice of tax liability shall be preserved until the 4expiration of that period. 5    Section 50. Violations and penalties.6    (a) If the amount due is under $300, any ground-based 7sparkler retailer who fails to file a return, willfully fails 8or refuses to make any payment to the Department of the tax 9imposed by this Act, or files a fraudulent return, or any 10officer or agent of a corporation engaged in the business of 11selling ground-based sparklers to purchasers located in this 12State who signs a fraudulent return filed on behalf of the 13corporation, or any accountant or other agent who knowingly 14enters false information on the return of any taxpayer under 15this Act is guilty of a Class 4 felony.16    (b) If the amount due is $300 or more, any ground-based 17sparkler retailer who files, or causes to be filed, a 18fraudulent return, or any officer or agent of a corporation 19engaged in the business of selling ground-based sparklers to 20purchasers located in this State who files or causes to be 21filed or signs or causes to be signed a fraudulent return filed 22on behalf of the corporation, or any accountant or other agent 23who knowingly enters false information on the return of any 24taxpayer under this Act is guilty of a Class 3 felony.25    (c) Any person who violates any provision of Section 30,   HB1625- 13 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1fails to keep books and records as required under this Act, or 2willfully violates a rule of the Department for the 3administration and enforcement of this Act is guilty of a 4Class 4 felony. A person commits a separate offense on each day 5that the person engages in business in violation of Section 30 6or a rule of the Department for the administration and 7enforcement of this Act. If a person fails to produce the books 8and records for inspection by the Department upon request, a 9prima facie presumption shall arise that the person has failed 10to keep books and records as required under this Act. A person 11who is unable to rebut this presumption is in violation of this 12Act and is subject to the penalties provided in this Section.13    (d) Any person who willfully violates a rule of the 14Department for the administration and enforcement of this 15Article, is guilty of a business offense and may be fined up to 16$5,000.17    (e) Any taxpayer or agent of a taxpayer who with the intent 18to defraud purports to make a payment due to the Department by 19issuing or delivering a check or other order upon a real or 20fictitious depository for the payment of money, knowing that 21it will not be paid by the depository, is guilty of a deceptive 22practice in violation of Section 17-1 of the Criminal Code of 232012.24    (f) Any person who fails to keep books and records or fails 25to produce books and records for inspection, as required by 26Section 45, is liable to pay to the Department, for deposit in   HB1625- 14 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1the Tax Compliance and Administration Fund, a penalty of 2$1,000 for the first failure to keep books and records or 3failure to produce books and records for inspection, as 4required by Section 45, and $3,000 for each subsequent failure 5to keep books and records or failure to produce books and 6records for inspection, as required by Section 45.7    (g) Any person who knowingly acts as a ground-based 8sparkler retailer in this State without first having obtained 9a certificate of registration to do so in compliance with 10Section 25 shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.11    (h) A person commits the offense of tax evasion under this 12Act when a person knowingly attempts in any manner to evade or 13defeat the tax imposed on the person or on any other person, or 14the payment thereof, and a person commits an affirmative act 15in furtherance of the evasion.16    Two or more acts of sales tax evasion may be charged as a 17single count in any indictment, information, or complaint and 18the amount of tax deficiency may be aggregated for purposes of 19determining the amount of tax that is attempted to be or is 20evaded and the period between the first and last acts may be 21alleged as the date of the offense.22        (1) If the amount of tax, the assessment or payment of 23    which is attempted to be or is evaded is less than $500, a 24    person is guilty of a Class 4 felony.25        (2) If the amount of tax, the assessment or payment of 26    which is attempted to be or is evaded is $500 or more but   HB1625- 15 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1    less than $10,000, a person is guilty of a Class 3 felony.2        (3) If the amount of tax, the assessment or payment of 3    which is attempted to be or is evaded is $10,000 or more 4    but less than $100,000, a person is guilty of a Class 2 5    felony.6        (4) If the amount of tax, the assessment or payment of 7    which is attempted to be or is evaded is $100,000 or more, 8    a person is guilty of a Class 1 felony.9    Any person who knowingly sells, purchases, installs, 10transfers, possesses, uses, or accesses any automated sales 11suppression device, zapper, or phantom-ware in this State is 12guilty of a Class 3 felony.13    A prosecution for any act in violation of this Section may 14be commenced at any time within 5 years of the commission of 15that act.16    (i) The Department may adopt rules to administer the 17penalties under this Section.18    (j) Any person whose principal place of business is in 19this State and who is charged with a violation under this 20Section shall be tried in the county where the person's 21principal place of business is located unless the person 22asserts a right to be tried in another venue.23    (k) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h), a 24prosecution for a violation described in this Section may be 25commenced within 3 years after the commission of the act 26constituting the violation.   HB1625- 16 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1    Section 55. Department administration and enforcement. The 2Department shall have full power to administer and enforce 3this Act, to collect all taxes and penalties due hereunder, to 4dispose of taxes and penalties so collected in the manner 5hereinafter provided, and to determine all rights to credit 6memoranda, arising on account of the erroneous payment of tax 7or penalty hereunder.8    In the administration of, and compliance with, this Act, 9the Department and persons who are subject to this Act shall 10have the same rights, remedies, privileges, immunities, 11powers, and duties, and be subject to the same conditions, 12restrictions, limitations, penalties, and definitions of 13terms, and employ the same modes of procedure, as are 14prescribed in Sections 2, 3-55, 3a, 4, 5, 7, 10a, 11, 12a, 12b, 1514, 15, 19, 20, 21, and 22 of the Use Tax Act and Sections 1, 162-12, 2b, 4 (except that the time limitation provisions shall 17run from the date when the tax is due rather than from the date 18when gross receipts are received), 5 (except that the time 19limitation provisions on the issuance of notices of tax 20liability shall run from the date when the tax is due rather 21than from the date when gross receipts are received and except 22that in the case of a failure to file a return required by this 23Act, no notice of tax liability shall be issued on and after 24each July 1 and January 1 covering tax due with that return 25during any month or period more than 6 years before that July 1   HB1625- 17 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1or January 1, respectively), 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5i, 25j, 6d, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 of the Retailers' Occupation 3Tax Act and all of the provisions of the Uniform Penalty and 4Interest Act, which are not inconsistent with this Act, as 5fully as if those provisions were set forth herein. References 6in the incorporated Sections of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 7Act and the Use Tax Act to retailers, to sellers, or to persons 8engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property 9mean ground-based sparkler retailers when used in this Act. 10References in the incorporated Sections to sales of tangible 11personal property mean sales of ground-based sparklers subject 12to tax under this Act when used in this Act. 13    Section 60. Arrest; search and seizure without warrant. 14Any duly authorized employee of the Department (i) may arrest, 15without warrant, any person committing in their presence a 16violation of any of the provisions of this Act, (ii) may, 17without a search warrant, inspect all ground-based sparklers 18located in any place of the business, and (iii) may seize any 19ground-based sparklers in the possession of the ground-based 20sparkler retailer in violation of this Act. The ground-based 21sparklers so seized are subject to confiscation and forfeiture 22as provided in Sections 65 and 70. 23    Section 65. Seizure and forfeiture. After seizing any 24ground-based sparklers as provided in Section 60, the   HB1625- 18 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1Department must hold a hearing and determine whether (i) the 2ground-based sparkler retailer was properly registered to sell 3the ground-based sparklers, (ii) the ground-based sparkler 4retailer possessed the ground-based sparklers in violation of 5this Act, or (iii) the ground-based sparkler retailer 6possessed the ground-based sparklers in violation of any 7reasonable rule adopted by the Department for the enforcement 8of this Act at the time of its seizure by the Department. The 9Department shall give not less than 20 days' notice of the time 10and place of the hearing to the owner of the ground-based 11sparklers, if the owner is known, and also to the person in 12whose possession the ground-based sparklers were found, if 13that person is known and if the person in possession is not the 14owner of the ground-based sparklers. If neither the owner nor 15the person in possession of the ground-based sparklers is 16known, the Department must cause publication of the time and 17place of the hearing to be made at least once in each week for 183 weeks successively in a newspaper of general circulation in 19the county where the hearing is to be held.20    If, as the result of the hearing, the Department makes any 21of the findings listed in (i) through (iii) above, the 22Department must enter an order declaring the ground-based 23sparklers confiscated and forfeited to the State, to be held 24by the Department for disposal by it as provided in Section 70. 25The Department must give notice of the order to the owner of 26the ground-based sparklers, if the owner is known, and also to   HB1625- 19 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1the person in whose possession the ground-based sparklers were 2found, if that person is known and if the person in possession 3is not the owner of the ground-based sparklers. If neither the 4owner nor the person in possession of the ground-based 5sparklers is known, the Department must cause publication of 6the order to be made at least once in each week for 3 weeks 7successively in a newspaper of general circulation in the 8county where the hearing was held. 9    Section 70. Search warrant; issuance and return; process; 10confiscation of ground-based sparklers; forfeitures.11    (a) If a peace officer of this State or any duly authorized 12officer or employee of the Department has reason to believe 13that any violation of this Act or a rule of the Department for 14the administration and enforcement of this Act has occurred 15and that the person violating this Act or rule has in that 16person's possession any ground-based sparklers in violation of 17this Act or a rule of the Department for the administration and 18enforcement of this Act, that peace officer or officer or 19employee of the Department may file or cause to be filed a 20complaint in writing, verified by affidavit, with any court 21within whose jurisdiction the premises to be searched are 22situated, stating the facts upon which the belief is founded, 23the premises to be searched, and the property to be seized, and 24procure a search warrant and execute that warrant. Upon the 25execution of the search warrant, the peace officer, or officer   HB1625- 20 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1or employee of the Department, executing the search warrant 2shall make due return of the warrant to the court issuing the 3warrant, together with an inventory of the property taken 4under the warrant. The court must then issue process against 5the owner of the property if the owner is known; otherwise, 6process must be issued against the person in whose possession 7the property is found, if that person is known. In case of 8inability to serve process upon the owner or the person in 9possession of the property at the time of its seizure, notice 10of the proceedings before the court must be given in the same 11manner as required by the law governing cases of attachment. 12Upon the return of the process duly served or upon the posting 13or publishing of notice made, as appropriate, the court or 14jury, if a jury is demanded, shall proceed to determine 15whether the property so seized was held or possessed in 16violation of this Act or a rule of the Department for the 17administration and enforcement of this Act. If a violation is 18found, judgment shall be entered confiscating the property and 19forfeiting it to the State and ordering its delivery to the 20Department. In addition, the court may tax and assess the 21costs of the proceedings.22    (b) If any ground-based sparklers have been declared 23forfeited to the State by the Department and all proceedings 24for the judicial review of the Department's decision have 25terminated, the Department shall, to the extent that its 26decision is sustained on review, destroy such ground-based   HB1625- 21 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1sparklers. 2    Section 75. Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules in 3accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and 4prescribe forms relating to the administration and enforcement 5of this Act as it deems appropriate. 6    Section 900. The Fireworks Regulation Act of Illinois is 7amended by changing Sections 2, 3.5, and 24 and by adding 8Section 3.6 as follows: 9    (425 ILCS 30/2)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 102)10    Sec. 2. The following words and phrases, when used in this 11Act, shall for the purpose of this Act have the following 12definition and meaning:13    (a) The term "fireworks" means shall mean and include any 14explosive composition or any substance or combination of 15substances, or article prepared for the purpose of producing a 16visible or audible effect of a temporary exhibitional nature 17by explosion, combustion, deflagration, or detonation. 18"Fireworks" includes , and shall include blank cartridges, toy 19cannons in which explosives are used, the type of balloons 20which require fire underneath to propel the same, 21firecrackers, torpedoes, sky rockets, Roman candles, bombs or 22other fireworks of like construction, and any fireworks 23containing any explosive compound; or any tablets or other   HB1625- 22 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1device containing any explosive substance, or containing 2combustible substances producing visual effects. "Fireworks" 3does The term "fireworks" shall not include snake or glow worm 4pellets; smoke devices; sparklers; ground-based sparklers that 5(i) are nonexplosive and nonaerial, (ii) may produce a 6crackling or whistling effect, and (iii) contain 75 grams or 7less of pyrotechnic composition per tube or a total of 500 8grams or less for multiple tubes, such as cones, including 9showers of sparks, as well as fountains; trick noisemakers 10known as "party poppers", "booby traps", "snappers", "trick 11matches", "cigarette loads", and "auto burglar alarms"; toy 12pistols, toy canes, toy guns, or other devices in which paper 13or plastic caps containing twenty-five hundredths grains or 14less of explosive compound are used, provided they are so 15constructed that the hand cannot come in contact with the cap 16when in place for the explosion; and toy pistol paper or 17plastic caps which contain less than twenty-five hundredths 18grains of explosive mixture; the sale and use of which shall be 19permitted at all times.20    (b) "Fireworks plant" means The term "fireworks plant" 21shall mean and include all lands, with buildings thereon, used 22in connection with the manufacture or processing of fireworks, 23as well as storehouses located thereon for the storage of 24finished fireworks.25    (c) "Fireworks factory building" means The term "fireworks 26factory building" shall mean any building or other structure   HB1625- 23 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1in which the manufacture of fireworks, or in which any 2processing involving fireworks is carried on.3    (d) "Magazine" means The term "magazine" shall mean any 4building or other structure used for the storage of explosive 5raw materials used in the manufacture of fireworks.6    (e) "Office" means The term "Office" shall mean the Office 7of the State Fire Marshal.8(Source: P.A. 83-474.) 9    (425 ILCS 30/3.5)10    Sec. 3.5. Sale and use prohibited on public property. A 11municipality may, by ordinance, prohibit the sale and use of 12sparklers or ground-based sparklers on public property.13(Source: P.A. 92-93, eff. 1-1-02.) 14    (425 ILCS 30/3.6 new)15    Sec. 3.6. Sale of ground-based sparklers. No ground-based 16sparkler that (i) is nonexplosive and nonaerial, (ii) may 17produce a crackling or whistling effect, and (iii) contains 75 18grams or less of pyrotechnic composition per tube or a total of 19500 grams or less for multiple tubes, such as cones, including 20showers of sparks, as well as fountains, may be sold to a 21person under the age of 18 years. 22    (425 ILCS 30/24)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 124)23    Sec. 24. The provisions of this Act shall not be construed   HB1625- 24 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1or held to abrogate or in any way affect the power of cities, 2villages, and incorporated towns to regulate, restrain and 3prohibit the use of fireworks, firecrackers, torpedoes, Roman 4candles, skyrockets, ground-based sparklers, and other 5pyrotechnic displays within their corporate limits. The 6sections of this Act and every part of such sections are hereby 7declared to be independent sections and parts of sections, and 8the invalidity of any section or part thereof shall not affect 9any other section or part of a section. However, the retail 10sales of ground-based sparklers may not be further regulated, 11restrained, or prohibited provided that the ground-based 12sparkler retailer, as defined in Section 5-2, complies with 13the National Fire Protection Association standard, NFPA 1124, 14Code for the Manufacture, Transportation, Storage, and Retail 15Sales of Fireworks and Pyrotechnic Articles, 2006 Edition. 16(Source: Laws 1935, p. 881.) 17    Section 905. The Pyrotechnic Use Act is amended by 18changing Section 1 and by adding Section 3.5 as follows: 19    (425 ILCS 35/1)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 127)20    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act, the following 21words shall have the following meanings:22    "1.3G fireworks" means those fireworks used for 23professional outdoor displays and classified as fireworks 24UN0333, UN0334, or UN0335 by the United States Department of   HB1625- 25 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1Transportation under 49 C.F.R. 172.101.2    "Consumer distributor" means any person who distributes, 3offers for sale, sells, or exchanges for consideration 4consumer fireworks in Illinois to another distributor or 5directly to any retailer or person for resale.6    "Consumer fireworks" means those fireworks that must 7comply with the construction, chemical composition, and 8labeling regulations of the U.S. Consumer Products Safety 9Commission, as set forth in 16 C.F.R. Parts 1500 and 1507, and 10classified as fireworks UN0336 or UN0337 by the United States 11Department of Transportation under 49 C.F.R. 172.101. 12"Consumer fireworks" shall not include snake or glow worm 13pellets; smoke devices; trick noisemakers known as "party 14poppers", "booby traps", "snappers", "trick matches", 15"cigarette loads", and "auto burglar alarms"; sparklers; 16ground-based sparklers that (i) are nonexplosive and 17nonaerial, (ii) may produce a crackling or whistling effect, 18and (iii) contain 75 grams or less of pyrotechnic composition 19per tube or a total of 500 grams or less for multiple tubes, 20such as cones, including showers of sparks, as well as 21fountains; toy pistols, toy canes, toy guns, or other devices 22in which paper or plastic caps containing twenty-five 23hundredths grains or less of explosive compound are used, 24provided they are so constructed that the hand cannot come in 25contact with the cap when in place for the explosion; and toy 26pistol paper or plastic caps that contain less than twenty   HB1625- 26 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1hundredths grains of explosive mixture; the sale and use of 2which shall be permitted at all times.3    "Consumer fireworks display" or "consumer display" means 4the detonation, ignition, or deflagration of consumer 5fireworks to produce a visual or audible effect.6    "Consumer operator" means an adult individual who is 7responsible for the safety, setup, and discharge of the 8consumer fireworks display and who has completed the training 9required in Section 2.2 of this Act.10    "Consumer retailer" means any person who offers for sale, 11sells, or exchanges for consideration consumer fireworks in 12Illinois directly to any person with a consumer display 13permit.14    "Display fireworks" means 1.3G or special effects 15fireworks or as further defined in the Pyrotechnic Distributor 16and Operator Licensing Act.17    "Flame effect" means the detonation, ignition, or 18deflagration of flammable gases, liquids, or special materials 19to produce a thermal, physical, visual, or audible effect 20before the public, invitees, or licensees, regardless of 21whether admission is charged, in accordance with National Fire 22Protection Association 160 guidelines, and as may be further 23defined in the Pyrotechnic Distributor and Operator Licensing 24Act.25    "Lead pyrotechnic operator" means an individual who is 26responsible for the safety, setup, and discharge of the   HB1625- 27 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1pyrotechnic display or pyrotechnic service and who is licensed 2pursuant to the Pyrotechnic Distributor and Operator Licensing 3Act.4    "Person" means an individual, firm, corporation, 5association, partnership, company, consortium, joint venture, 6commercial entity, state, municipality, or political 7subdivision of a state or any agency, department, or 8instrumentality of the United States and any officer, agent, 9or employee of these entities. 10    "Production company" means any person in the film, digital 11and video media, television, commercial, music, or theatrical 12stage industry who provides pyrotechnic services or 13pyrotechnic display services as part of a film, digital and 14video media, television, commercial, music, or theatrical 15production in the State of Illinois and is licensed by the 16Office pursuant to the Pyrotechnic Distributor and Operator 17Licensing Act. 18    "Pyrotechnic display" means the detonation, ignition, or 19deflagration of display fireworks or flame effects to produce 20visual or audible effects of an exhibitional nature before the 21public, invitees, or licensees, regardless of whether 22admission is charged, and as may be further defined in the 23Pyrotechnic Distributor and Operator Licensing Act.24    "Pyrotechnic distributor" means any person who distributes 25display fireworks for sale in the State of Illinois or 26provides them as part of a pyrotechnic display service in the   HB1625- 28 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b1State of Illinois or provides only pyrotechnic services and is 2licensed by the Office pursuant to the Pyrotechnic Distributor 3and Operator Licensing Act.4    "Pyrotechnic service" means the detonation, ignition, or 5deflagration of display fireworks, special effects, or flame 6effects to produce a visual or audible effect. 7    "Special effects fireworks" means pyrotechnic devices used 8for special effects by professionals in the performing arts in 9conjunction with theatrical, musical, or other productions 10that are similar to consumer fireworks in chemical 11compositions and construction, but are not intended for 12consumer use and are not labeled as such or identified as 13"intended for indoor use". "Special effects fireworks" are 14classified as fireworks UN0431 or UN0432 by the United States 15Department of Transportation under 49 C.F.R. 172.101.16(Source: P.A. 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 17    (425 ILCS 35/3.5 new)18    Sec. 3.5. Sale of ground-based sparklers. No ground-based 19sparkler that (i) is nonexplosive and nonaerial, (ii) may 20produce a crackling or whistling effect, and (iii) contains 75 21grams or less of pyrotechnic composition per tube or a total of 22500 grams or less for multiple tubes, such as cones, including 23showers of sparks, as well as fountains, may be sold to a 24person under the age of 18 years. 25    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January   HB1625- 29 -LRB104 09392 BDA 19451 b11, 2026.